Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-625
Acts prohibited; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, transport, sell, purchase, barter, trade, import, export, or conspire to possess, transport, sell, purchase, barter, trade, import, or export any wildlife taken, possessed, transported, or exported in violation of the Game Law. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2026, LB979, § 20.
July 18, 2026